Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1504
Department, defined.

Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 38;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 80;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 365.